Washington statutes.
RCW 35.74.050

Authority to operate toll bridges—Toll rate review and approval by tolling authority.

A city or town may build and maintain toll bridges and charge and collect tolls thereon, and to that end may provide a system and elect or appoint persons to operate the same, or the said bridges may be made free, as it may elect.

Consistent with RCW 47.56.850, any toll proposed under this section, including any change in an existing toll rate, must first be reviewed and approved by the tolling authority designated in RCW 47.56.850 if the toll, or change in toll rate, would have a significant impact, as determined by the tolling authority, on the operation of any state facility.

[ 2008 c 122 s 15; 1965 c 7 s 35.74.050. Prior: 1890 p 55 s 6; RRS s 9328.]